Idaho statutes. Title 62 RAILROADS AND OTHER PUBLIC UTILITIES
Chapter 9
GAS CORPORATIONS

Sec.

§ 62-901. Consent of municipality must be obtained.

No corporation hereafter formed must supply any city or town with gas, or lay down mains or pipes for that purpose in the streets or alleys thereof, without permission from the city or town authorities.

§ 62-902. Duty to furnish gas on application.

Upon the application in writing of the owner or occupant of any building or premises distant not more than 100 feet from any main of the corporation, and payment by the applicant of all money due from him, the corporation must supply gas as required for such building or premises, and cannot refuse on the ground of any indebtedness of any former owner or occupant thereof, unless the applicant has undertaken to pay the same. If, for the space of ten (10) days after such application, the corporation refuses or neglects to supply the gas required, it must pay to the applicant the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) as liquidated damages, and five dollars ($5.00) a day as liquidated damages, for every day such refusal or neglect continues thereafter.

§ 62-903. Applicant must defray expenses.

No corporation is required to lay a service pipe where serious obstacles exist to laying it, unless the applicant, if required, deposits in advance with the corporation, a sum of money sufficient to pay the cost of laying such service pipe, or his proportion thereof.

§ 62-904. Right to inspect meters.

Any agent of a gas corporation, exhibiting written authority signed by the president or secretary thereof for such purpose, may enter any building or premises lighted with gas supplied by such corporation, to inspect the gas meters therein, to ascertain the quantity of gas supplied or consumed. Every owner or occupant of such buildings who hinders or prevents such entry or inspection must pay to the corporation the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) as liquidated damages.

§ 62-905. Discontinuance of supply.

All gas corporations may shut off the supply of gas from any person who neglects or refuses to pay for the gas supplied, or the rent for any meter, pipes, or fittings provided by the corporation as required by his contract; and for the purpose of shutting off the gas in such case, any employee of the corporation may enter the building or premises of such person, between the hours of eight o’clock in the forenoon and six o’clock in the afternoon of any day, and remove therefrom any property of the corporation used in supplying gas.